Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1420
Branch establishment; application for license; qualifications; relocation; change of manager; change of name.

(1) If the applicant for a branch establishment license proposes to operate more than one branch establishment, a separate application and fee shall be required for each location.

(2) A branch establishment desiring to relocate shall make application to the department at least thirty days prior to the designated date of such change in location.

(3) A branch establishment desiring to change its manager shall make application to the department at least fifteen days prior to the designated date of such change, except that in the case of death of the manager, the establishment shall make application immediately after such death. No license shall be issued by the department under this subsection until the original license has been surrendered.

(4) A branch establishment desiring to change its name shall apply to the department at least thirty days prior to the designated change in name.

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 99;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1327.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 556.